California, session 20252026, SB826.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. The Legislature finds and declares that seaports have increasingly come to rely on automated forms of information and operational technology. This digital dependence introduces vulnerabilities that, in the event of a cyberattack, could cause severe consequences and long-term damage. Further, the use of such automated technology leads to negative workforce and economic impacts.SEC. 2. Section 12893.1 is added to the Government Code, to read:12893.1. (a) (1) The Labor and Workforce Development Agency and the California Workforce Development Board shall oversee a stakeholder process to support the development of findings and recommendations on how to best mitigate the national security, cybersecurity, workforce, and economic impacts of automation at California seaports. To help inform the stakeholder process, an industry panel is hereby created in the agency. (2) The California Workforce Development Board may contract with University of California, Los Angeles (UCLA) Labor Center to perform the actions described in subdivision (e).(b) (1) The industry panel shall consist of the following members:(A) Fifteen members appointed by the Secretary of Labor and Workforce Development as follows:(i) Six members from employee unions that represent marine cargo handlers at the Port of Los Angeles, the Port of Long Beach, and the Port of Oakland.(ii) Six members who are representatives of marine cargo employers operating at the Port of Los Angeles, the Port of Long Beach, and the Port of Oakland.(iii) The Executive Director of the Port of Los Angeles or the executive director’s designee. (iv) The Executive Director of the Port of Long Beach or the executive director’s designee.(v) The Executive Director of the Port of Oakland or the executive director’s designee.(B) One member appointed by the Speaker of the Assembly with experience in national security, cybersecurity, workforce development, and seaports.(C) One member appointed by the Senate Committee on Rules with experience in national security, cybersecurity, workforce development, and seaports.(2) (A) Each member shall be appointed to a term of three years. (B) A member who fails to attend two industry panel meetings in one calendar year shall be deemed removed from the industry panel, and the appointing power for that member shall appoint a new member to fill the vacancy.(3) Industry panel members shall not receive per diem or other similar compensation for serving as an industry panel member.(c) (1) The industry panel shall invite stakeholders and subject matter experts to participate in the stakeholder process, including port districts, public agencies, labor organizations, shipping companies, marine-oriented trade associations, nonprofit organizations, and workforce development, economic, national security, and cybersecurity entities.(2) As appropriate, the costs of the industry panel and the stakeholder process may be reduced by in-kind or other contributions from third parties.(d) (1) During the process, representatives from the Labor and Workforce Development Agency and from the California Workforce Development Board and members of the industry panel shall consider issues, including, but not limited to, national security and cybersecurity vulnerabilities that result from the use of automated technology at seaports, associated economic consequences, including, but not limited to, workforce and economic impacts that result from the use of automated technology at seaports, short and long-term damage, and recommendations to reduce these risks to seaports. (2) (A) The first meeting of the stakeholder process shall be held on or before 90 days after the funding becomes available for the purposes of this section.(B) After the first meeting, the meetings of the stakeholder process shall be held no less than monthly in person or by video conference(e) The UCLA Labor Center may commission expert research and testimony to supplement the stakeholder process and support the development of findings and recommendations pursuant to this section. (f) The industry panel shall provide an annual update of the stakeholder process at a regularly scheduled meeting of the California Workforce Development Board.(g) Upon completion of the stakeholder process, but by no later than July 1, 2027, the Labor and Workforce Development Agency and the California Workforce Development Board shall issue findings and recommendations on the most effective ways to limit the national security cybersecurity vulnerabilities, workforce and economic impacts, and risks to seaports.(h) This section shall be implemented only upon an appropriation by the Legislature for the express purposes of this section.(i) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2029, and as of that date is repealed. SEC. 3. On or before December 31, 2027, the California Workforce Development Board shall present at a hearing of the Joint Legislative Committee on Climate Change Policies the findings and recommendations of the report.